Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.190

Additional judge.

Whenever the number of departments of the municipal court is increased, the mayor of such city shall appoint a qualified person as provided in RCW 35.20.170 to act as municipal judge until the next general election. He or she shall be paid salaries in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and provided with the necessary court, office space and personnel as authorized herein.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2039; 1967 c 241 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.190. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 19.]

NOTES:

Application—1967 c 241: See note following RCW 3.66.090.